Illinois, session 104th, SB3370.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Officials and Employees Ethics Act is 5amended by changing Section 5-45, 20-5, 25-5, and 50-5 as 6follows: 7    (5 ILCS 430/5-45)8    Sec. 5-45. Procurement; revolving door prohibition. 9    (a) No former officer, member, or State employee, or 10spouse or immediate family member living with such person, 11shall, within a period of one year immediately after 12termination of State employment, knowingly accept employment 13or receive compensation or fees for services from a person or 14entity if the officer, member, or State employee, during the 15year immediately preceding termination of State employment, 16participated personally and substantially in the award or 17fiscal administration of State contracts, or the issuance of 18State contract change orders, with a cumulative value of 19$25,000 or more to the person or entity, or its parent or 20subsidiary. 21    (a-5) No officer, member, or spouse or immediate family 22member living with such person shall, during the officer or 23member's term in office or within a period of 2 years   SB3370- 2 -LRB104 18795 BDA 32238 b1immediately leaving office, hold an ownership interest, other 2than a passive interest in a publicly traded company, in any 3gaming license under the Illinois Gambling Act, the Video 4Gaming Act, the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975, or the 5Sports Wagering Act. Any member of the General Assembly or 6spouse or immediate family member living with such person who 7has an ownership interest, other than a passive interest in a 8publicly traded company, in any gaming license under the 9Illinois Gambling Act, the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975, 10the Video Gaming Act, or the Sports Wagering Act at the time of 11the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 101st General 12Assembly shall divest himself or herself of such ownership 13within one year after the effective date of this amendatory 14Act of the 101st General Assembly. No State employee who works 15for the Illinois Gaming Board or Illinois Racing Board or 16spouse or immediate family member living with such person 17shall, during State employment or within a period of 2 years 18immediately after termination of State employment, hold an 19ownership interest, other than a passive interest in a 20publicly traded company, in any gaming license under the 21Illinois Gambling Act, the Video Gaming Act, the Illinois 22Horse Racing Act of 1975, or the Sports Wagering Act. 23    (a-10) This subsection (a-10) applies on and after June 2425, 2021. No officer, member, or spouse or immediate family 25member living with such person, shall, during the officer or 26member's term in office or within a period of 2 years   SB3370- 3 -LRB104 18795 BDA 32238 b1immediately after leaving office, hold an ownership interest, 2other than a passive interest in a publicly traded company, in 3any cannabis business establishment which is licensed under 4the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. Any member of the General 5Assembly or spouse or immediate family member living with such 6person who has an ownership interest, other than a passive 7interest in a publicly traded company, in any cannabis 8business establishment which is licensed under the Cannabis 9Regulation and Tax Act at the time of the effective date of 10this amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly shall divest 11himself or herself of such ownership within one year after the 12effective date of this amendatory Act of the 101st General 13Assembly.14    No State employee who works for any State agency that 15regulates cannabis business establishment license holders who 16participated personally and substantially in the award of 17licenses under the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or a spouse 18or immediate family member living with such person shall, 19during State employment or within a period of 2 years 20immediately after termination of State employment, hold an 21ownership interest, other than a passive interest in a 22publicly traded company, in any cannabis license under the 23Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 24    (b) No former officer of the executive branch or State 25employee of the executive branch with regulatory or licensing 26authority, or spouse or immediate family member living with   SB3370- 4 -LRB104 18795 BDA 32238 b1such person, shall, within a period of one year immediately 2after termination of State employment, knowingly accept 3employment or receive compensation or fees for services from a 4person or entity if the officer or State employee, during the 5year immediately preceding termination of State employment, 6participated personally and substantially in making a 7regulatory or licensing decision that directly applied to the 8person or entity, or its parent or subsidiary. 9    (b-5) Beginning January 1, 2022, no former officer of the 10executive branch shall engage in activities at the State level 11that require registration under the Lobbyist Registration Act 12during the term of which he or she was elected or appointed 13until 6 months after leaving office. 14    (b-7) Beginning the second Wednesday in January of 2023, 15no former member shall engage in activities at the State level 16that require registration under the Lobbyist Registration Act 17in a General Assembly of which he or she was a member until 6 18months after leaving office. 19    (c) Within 6 months after the effective date of this 20amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly, each executive 21branch constitutional officer and legislative leader, the 22Auditor General, and the Joint Committee on Legislative 23Support Services shall adopt a policy delineating which State 24positions under his or her jurisdiction and control, by the 25nature of their duties, may have the authority to participate 26personally and substantially in the award or fiscal   SB3370- 5 -LRB104 18795 BDA 32238 b1administration of State contracts or in regulatory or 2licensing decisions. The Governor shall adopt such a policy 3for all State employees of the executive branch not under the 4jurisdiction and control of any other executive branch 5constitutional officer. 6    The policies required under subsection (c) of this Section 7shall be filed with the appropriate ethics commission 8established under this Act or, for the Auditor General, with 9the Office of the Auditor General.10    (d) Each Inspector General shall have the authority to 11determine that additional State positions under his or her 12jurisdiction, not otherwise subject to the policies required 13by subsection (c) of this Section, are nonetheless subject to 14the notification requirement of subsection (f) below due to 15their involvement in the award or fiscal administration of 16State contracts or in regulatory or licensing decisions.17    (e) The Joint Committee on Legislative Support Services, 18the Auditor General, and each of the executive branch 19constitutional officers and legislative leaders subject to 20subsection (c) of this Section shall provide written 21notification to all employees in positions subject to the 22policies required by subsection (c) or a determination made 23under subsection (d): (1) upon hiring, promotion, or transfer 24into the relevant position; and (2) at the time the employee's 25duties are changed in such a way as to qualify that employee. 26An employee receiving notification must certify in writing   SB3370- 6 -LRB104 18795 BDA 32238 b1that the person was advised of the prohibition and the 2requirement to notify the appropriate Inspector General in 3subsection (f).4    (f) Any State employee in a position subject to the 5policies required by subsection (c) or to a determination 6under subsection (d), but who does not fall within the 7prohibition of subsection (h) below, who is offered non-State 8employment during State employment or within a period of one 9year immediately after termination of State employment shall, 10prior to accepting such non-State employment, notify the 11appropriate Inspector General. Within 10 calendar days after 12receiving notification from an employee in a position subject 13to the policies required by subsection (c), such Inspector 14General shall make a determination as to whether the State 15employee is restricted from accepting such employment by 16subsection (a) or (b). In making a determination, in addition 17to any other relevant information, an Inspector General shall 18assess the effect of the prospective employment or 19relationship upon decisions referred to in subsections (a) and 20(b), based on the totality of the participation by the former 21officer, member, or State employee in those decisions. A 22determination by an Inspector General must be in writing, 23signed and dated by the Inspector General, and delivered to 24the subject of the determination within 10 calendar days or 25the person is deemed eligible for the employment opportunity. 26For purposes of this subsection, "appropriate Inspector   SB3370- 7 -LRB104 18795 BDA 32238 b1General" means (i) for members and employees of the 2legislative branch, the Legislative Inspector General; (ii) 3for the Auditor General and employees of the Office of the 4Auditor General, the Inspector General provided for in Section 530-5 of this Act; and (iii) for executive branch officers and 6employees, the Inspector General having jurisdiction over the 7officer or employee. Notice of any determination of an 8Inspector General and of any such appeal shall be given to the 9ultimate jurisdictional authority, the Attorney General, and 10the Executive Ethics Commission.11    (g) An Inspector General's determination regarding 12restrictions under subsection (a) or (b) may be appealed to 13the appropriate Ethics Commission by the person subject to the 14decision or the Attorney General no later than the 10th 15calendar day after the date of the determination.16    On appeal, the Ethics Commission or Auditor General shall 17seek, accept, and consider written public comments regarding a 18determination. In deciding whether to uphold an Inspector 19General's determination, the appropriate Ethics Commission or 20Auditor General shall assess, in addition to any other 21relevant information, the effect of the prospective employment 22or relationship upon the decisions referred to in subsections 23(a) and (b), based on the totality of the participation by the 24former officer, member, or State employee in those decisions. 25The Ethics Commission shall decide whether to uphold an 26Inspector General's determination within 10 calendar days or   SB3370- 8 -LRB104 18795 BDA 32238 b1the person is deemed eligible for the employment opportunity.2    (h) The following officers, members, or State employees 3shall not, within a period of one year immediately after 4termination of office or State employment, knowingly accept 5employment or receive compensation or fees for services from a 6person or entity if the person or entity or its parent or 7subsidiary, during the year immediately preceding termination 8of State employment, was a party to a State contract or 9contracts with a cumulative value of $25,000 or more involving 10the officer, member, or State employee's State agency, or was 11the subject of a regulatory or licensing decision involving 12the officer, member, or State employee's State agency, 13regardless of whether he or she participated personally and 14substantially in the award or fiscal administration of the 15State contract or contracts or the making of the regulatory or 16licensing decision in question:17        (1) members or officers;18        (2) members of a commission or board created by the 19    Illinois Constitution;20        (3) persons whose appointment to office is subject to 21    the advice and consent of the Senate;22        (4) the head of a department, commission, board, 23    division, bureau, authority, or other administrative unit 24    within the government of this State;25        (5) chief procurement officers, State purchasing 26    officers, and their designees whose duties are directly   SB3370- 9 -LRB104 18795 BDA 32238 b1    related to State procurement;2        (6) chiefs of staff, deputy chiefs of staff, associate 3    chiefs of staff, assistant chiefs of staff, and deputy 4    governors, or any other position that holds an equivalent 5    level of managerial oversight;6        (7) employees of the Illinois Racing Board; and7        (8) employees of the Illinois Gaming Board.8    (i) For the purposes of this Section, with respect to 9officers or employees of a regional transit board, as defined 10in this Act, the phrase "person or entity" does not include: 11(i) the United States government, (ii) the State, (iii) 12municipalities, as defined under Article VII, Section 1 of the 13Illinois Constitution, (iv) units of local government, as 14defined under Article VII, Section 1 of the Illinois 15Constitution, or (v) school districts. 16    (j) An employer shall not knowingly offer employment, 17compensation, or fees for services to a person if that person 18is prohibited by this Section from accepting employment, 19compensation, or fees for services from that employer. 20(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19; 21102-664, eff. 1-1-22.) 22    (5 ILCS 430/20-5)23    Sec. 20-5. Executive Ethics Commission.24    (a) The Executive Ethics Commission is created.25    (b) The Executive Ethics Commission shall consist of 9   SB3370- 10 -LRB104 18795 BDA 32238 b1commissioners. The Governor shall appoint 5 commissioners, and 2the Attorney General, Secretary of State, Comptroller, and 3Treasurer shall each appoint one commissioner. Appointments 4shall be made by and with the advice and consent of the Senate 5by three-fifths of the elected members concurring by record 6vote. Any nomination not acted upon by the Senate within 60 7session days of the receipt thereof shall be deemed to have 8received the advice and consent of the Senate. If, during a 9recess of the Senate, there is a vacancy in an office of 10commissioner, the appointing authority shall make a temporary 11appointment until the next meeting of the Senate when the 12appointing authority shall make a nomination to fill that 13office. No person rejected for an office of commissioner 14shall, except by the Senate's request, be nominated again for 15that office at the same session of the Senate or be appointed 16to that office during a recess of that Senate. No more than 5 17commissioners may be of the same political party. 18    The terms of the initial commissioners shall commence upon 19qualification. Four initial appointees of the Governor, as 20designated by the Governor, shall serve terms running through 21June 30, 2007. One initial appointee of the Governor, as 22designated by the Governor, and the initial appointees of the 23Attorney General, Secretary of State, Comptroller, and 24Treasurer shall serve terms running through June 30, 2008. The 25initial appointments shall be made within 60 days after the 26effective date of this Act.  SB3370- 11 -LRB104 18795 BDA 32238 b1    After the initial terms, commissioners shall serve for 24-year terms commencing on July 1 of the year of appointment 3and running through June 30 of the fourth following year. 4Commissioners may be reappointed to one or more subsequent 5terms. 6    Vacancies occurring other than at the end of a term shall 7be filled by the appointing authority only for the balance of 8the term of the commissioner whose office is vacant. 9    Terms shall run regardless of whether the position is 10filled. 11    (c) The appointing authorities shall appoint commissioners 12who have experience holding governmental office or employment 13and shall appoint commissioners from the general public. A 14person is not eligible to serve as a commissioner if that 15person (i) has been convicted of a felony or a crime of 16dishonesty or moral turpitude, (ii) is, or was within the 17preceding 12 months, engaged in activities that require 18registration under the Lobbyist Registration Act, (iii) is 19related to the appointing authority, or (iv) is a State 20officer or employee. 21    (d) The Executive Ethics Commission shall have 22jurisdiction over all officers and employees of State agencies 23other than the General Assembly, the Senate, the House of 24Representatives, the President and Minority Leader of the 25Senate, the Speaker and Minority Leader of the House of 26Representatives, the Senate Operations Commission, the   SB3370- 12 -LRB104 18795 BDA 32238 b1legislative support services agencies, and the Office of the 2Auditor General. The Executive Ethics Commission shall have 3jurisdiction over all board members and employees of Regional 4Transit Boards, and all board members and employees of 5Regional Development Authorities, and all employers who make 6offers of employment, compensation, or fees for services in 7violation of subsection (j) of Section 5-45. The jurisdiction 8of the Commission is limited to matters arising under this 9Act, except as provided in subsection (d-5). 10    A member or legislative branch State employee serving on 11an executive branch board or commission remains subject to the 12jurisdiction of the Legislative Ethics Commission and is not 13subject to the jurisdiction of the Executive Ethics 14Commission. 15    (d-5) The Executive Ethics Commission shall have 16jurisdiction over all chief procurement officers and 17procurement compliance monitors and their respective staffs. 18The Executive Ethics Commission shall have jurisdiction over 19any matters arising under the Illinois Procurement Code if the 20Commission is given explicit authority in that Code. 21    (d-6) (1) The Executive Ethics Commission shall have 22jurisdiction over the Illinois Power Agency and its staff. The 23Director of the Agency shall be appointed by a majority of the 24commissioners of the Executive Ethics Commission, subject to 25Senate confirmation, for a term of 2 years. The Director is 26removable for cause by a majority of the Commission upon a   SB3370- 13 -LRB104 18795 BDA 32238 b1finding of neglect, malfeasance, absence, or incompetence.2    (2) In case of a vacancy in the office of Director of the 3Illinois Power Agency during a recess of the Senate, the 4Executive Ethics Commission may make a temporary appointment 5until the next meeting of the Senate, at which time the 6Executive Ethics Commission shall nominate some person to fill 7the office, and any person so nominated who is confirmed by the 8Senate shall hold office during the remainder of the term and 9until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. Nothing 10in this subsection shall prohibit the Executive Ethics 11Commission from removing a temporary appointee or from 12appointing a temporary appointee as the Director of the 13Illinois Power Agency. 14    (3) Prior to June 1, 2012, the Executive Ethics Commission 15may, until the Director of the Illinois Power Agency is 16appointed and qualified or a temporary appointment is made 17pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection, designate some 18person as an acting Director to execute the powers and 19discharge the duties vested by law in that Director. An acting 20Director shall serve no later than 60 calendar days, or upon 21the making of an appointment pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) 22of this subsection, whichever is earlier. Nothing in this 23subsection shall prohibit the Executive Ethics Commission from 24removing an acting Director or from appointing an acting 25Director as the Director of the Illinois Power Agency. 26    (4) No person rejected by the Senate for the office of   SB3370- 14 -LRB104 18795 BDA 32238 b1Director of the Illinois Power Agency shall, except at the 2Senate's request, be nominated again for that office at the 3same session or be appointed to that office during a recess of 4that Senate. 5    (d-7) The Executive Ethics Commission shall have 6jurisdiction over complainants and respondents in violation of 7subsection (d) of Section 20-90. 8    (e) The Executive Ethics Commission must meet, either in 9person or by other technological means, at least monthly and 10as often as necessary. At the first meeting of the Executive 11Ethics Commission, the commissioners shall choose from their 12number a chairperson and other officers that they deem 13appropriate. The terms of officers shall be for 2 years 14commencing July 1 and running through June 30 of the second 15following year. Meetings shall be held at the call of the 16chairperson or any 3 commissioners. Official action by the 17Commission shall require the affirmative vote of 5 18commissioners, and a quorum shall consist of 5 commissioners. 19Commissioners shall receive compensation in an amount equal to 20the compensation of members of the State Board of Elections 21and may be reimbursed for their reasonable expenses actually 22incurred in the performance of their duties. 23    (f) No commissioner or employee of the Executive Ethics 24Commission may during his or her term of appointment or 25employment:26        (1) become a candidate for any elective office;  SB3370- 15 -LRB104 18795 BDA 32238 b1        (2) hold any other elected or appointed public office 2    except for appointments on governmental advisory boards or 3    study commissions or as otherwise expressly authorized by 4    law;5        (3) be actively involved in the affairs of any 6    political party or political organization; or7        (4) advocate for the appointment of another person to 8    an appointed or elected office or position or actively 9    participate in any campaign for any elective office.10    (g) An appointing authority may remove a commissioner only 11for cause.12    (h) The Executive Ethics Commission shall appoint an 13Executive Director. The compensation of the Executive Director 14shall be as determined by the Commission. The Executive 15Director of the Executive Ethics Commission may employ and 16determine the compensation of staff, as appropriations permit.17    (i) The Executive Ethics Commission shall appoint, by a 18majority of the members appointed to the Commission, chief 19procurement officers and may appoint procurement compliance 20monitors in accordance with the provisions of the Illinois 21Procurement Code. The compensation of a chief procurement 22officer and procurement compliance monitor shall be determined 23by the Commission. 24(Source: P.A. 103-517, eff. 8-11-23.) 25    (5 ILCS 430/25-5)  SB3370- 16 -LRB104 18795 BDA 32238 b1    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-435)2    Sec. 25-5. Legislative Ethics Commission. 3    (a) The Legislative Ethics Commission is created. 4    (b) The Legislative Ethics Commission shall consist of 8 5commissioners appointed 2 each by the President and Minority 6Leader of the Senate and the Speaker and Minority Leader of the 7House of Representatives.8    The terms of the initial commissioners shall commence upon 9qualification. Each appointing authority shall designate one 10appointee who shall serve for a 2-year term running through 11June 30, 2005. Each appointing authority shall designate one 12appointee who shall serve for a 4-year term running through 13June 30, 2007. The initial appointments shall be made within 1460 days after the effective date of this Act.15    After the initial terms, commissioners shall serve for 164-year terms commencing on July 1 of the year of appointment 17and running through June 30 of the fourth following year. 18Commissioners may be reappointed to one or more subsequent 19terms.20    A vacancy shall occur upon a commissioner's death, 21resignation, removal, disqualification, termination of 22legislative service in the house or caucus of the appointing 23authority, or other inability to act. Vacancies occurring 24other than at the end of a term shall be filled by the 25appointing authority only for the balance of the term of the 26commissioner whose office is vacant.  SB3370- 17 -LRB104 18795 BDA 32238 b1    Terms shall run regardless of whether the position is 2filled. 3    (c) The appointing authorities shall appoint commissioners 4who have experience holding governmental office or employment 5and may appoint commissioners who are members of the General 6Assembly as well as commissioners from the general public. A 7commissioner who is a member of the General Assembly must 8recuse himself or herself from participating in any matter 9relating to any investigation or proceeding in which he or she 10is the subject or is a complainant. A person is not eligible to 11serve as a commissioner if that person (i) has been convicted 12of a felony or a crime of dishonesty or moral turpitude, (ii) 13is, or was within the preceding 12 months, engaged in 14activities that require registration under the Lobbyist 15Registration Act, (iii) is a relative of the appointing 16authority, (iv) is a State officer or employee other than a 17member of the General Assembly, or (v) is a candidate for 18statewide, federal, or judicial office.19    (c-5) If a commissioner is required to recuse himself or 20herself from participating in a matter as provided in 21subsection (c), the recusal shall create a temporary vacancy 22for the limited purpose of consideration of the matter for 23which the commissioner recused himself or herself, and the 24appointing authority for the recusing commissioner shall make 25a temporary appointment to fill the vacancy for consideration 26of the matter for which the commissioner recused himself or   SB3370- 18 -LRB104 18795 BDA 32238 b1herself. 2    (d) The Legislative Ethics Commission shall have 3jurisdiction over current and former members of the General 4Assembly regarding events occurring during a member's term of 5office and current and former State employees regarding events 6occurring during any period of employment where the State 7employee's ultimate jurisdictional authority is (i) a 8legislative leader, (ii) the Senate Operations Commission, or 9(iii) the Joint Committee on Legislative Support Services. The 10Legislative Ethics Commission shall have jurisdiction over 11complainants and respondents in violation of subsection (d) of 12Section 25-90, and it shall also have jurisdiction over 13employers who make offers of employment, compensation, or fees 14for services in violation of subsection (j) of Section 5-45. 15The jurisdiction of the Commission is limited to matters 16arising under this Act.17    An officer or executive branch State employee serving on a 18legislative branch board or commission remains subject to the 19jurisdiction of the Executive Ethics Commission and is not 20subject to the jurisdiction of the Legislative Ethics 21Commission. 22    (e) The Legislative Ethics Commission must meet, either in 23person or by other technological means, monthly or as often as 24necessary. At the first meeting of the Legislative Ethics 25Commission, the commissioners shall choose from their number a 26chairperson and other officers that they deem appropriate. The   SB3370- 19 -LRB104 18795 BDA 32238 b1terms of officers shall be for 2 years commencing July 1 and 2running through June 30 of the second following year. Meetings 3shall be held at the call of the chairperson or any 3 4commissioners. Official action by the Commission shall require 5the affirmative vote of 5 commissioners, and a quorum shall 6consist of 5 commissioners. Commissioners shall receive no 7compensation but may be reimbursed for their reasonable 8expenses actually incurred in the performance of their duties.9    (f) No commissioner, other than a commissioner who is a 10member of the General Assembly, or employee of the Legislative 11Ethics Commission may during his or her term of appointment or 12employment:13        (1) become a candidate for any elective office;14        (2) hold any other elected or appointed public office 15    except for appointments on governmental advisory boards or 16    study commissions or as otherwise expressly authorized by 17    law;18        (3) be actively involved in the affairs of any 19    political party or political organization; or20        (4) advocate for the appointment of another person to 21    an appointed or elected office or position or actively 22    participate in any campaign for any elective office.23    (f-5) No commissioner who is a member of the General 24Assembly may be a candidate for statewide, federal, or 25judicial office. If a commissioner who is a member of the 26General Assembly files petitions to be a candidate for a   SB3370- 20 -LRB104 18795 BDA 32238 b1statewide, federal, or judicial office, he or she shall be 2deemed to have resigned from his or her position as a 3commissioner on the date his or her name is certified for the 4ballot by the State Board of Elections or local election 5authority and his or her position as a commissioner shall be 6deemed vacant. Such person may not be reappointed to the 7Commission during any time he or she is a candidate for 8statewide, federal, or judicial office. 9    (g) An appointing authority may remove a commissioner only 10for cause. 11    (h) The Legislative Ethics Commission shall appoint an 12Executive Director subject to the approval of at least 3 of the 134 legislative leaders. The compensation of the Executive 14Director shall be as determined by the Commission. The 15Executive Director of the Legislative Ethics Commission may 16employ, subject to the approval of at least 3 of the 4 17legislative leaders, and determine the compensation of staff, 18as appropriations permit.19    (i) In consultation with the Legislative Inspector 20General, the Legislative Ethics Commission may develop 21comprehensive training for members and employees under its 22jurisdiction that includes, but is not limited to, sexual 23harassment, employment discrimination, and workplace civility. 24The training may be recommended to the ultimate jurisdictional 25authorities and may be approved by the Commission to satisfy 26the sexual harassment training required under Section 5-10.5   SB3370- 21 -LRB104 18795 BDA 32238 b1or be provided in addition to the annual sexual harassment 2training required under Section 5-10.5. The Commission may 3seek input from governmental agencies or private entities for 4guidance in developing such training. 5(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-221, eff. 8-9-19; 6101-617, eff. 12-20-19; 102-664, eff. 1-1-22.) 7    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-435)8    Sec. 25-5. Legislative Ethics Commission. 9    (a) The Legislative Ethics Commission is created. 10    (b) The Legislative Ethics Commission shall consist of 8 11commissioners appointed 2 each by the President and Minority 12Leader of the Senate and the Speaker and Minority Leader of the 13House of Representatives.14    The terms of the initial commissioners shall commence upon 15qualification. Each appointing authority shall designate one 16appointee who shall serve for a 2-year term running through 17June 30, 2005. Each appointing authority shall designate one 18appointee who shall serve for a 4-year term running through 19June 30, 2007. The initial appointments shall be made within 2060 days after the effective date of this Act.21    After the initial terms, commissioners shall serve for 224-year terms commencing on July 1 of the year of appointment 23and running through June 30 of the fourth following year. 24Commissioners may be reappointed to one or more subsequent 25terms.  SB3370- 22 -LRB104 18795 BDA 32238 b1    A vacancy shall occur upon a commissioner's death, 2resignation, removal, disqualification, termination of 3legislative service in the house or caucus of the appointing 4authority, or other inability to act. Vacancies occurring 5other than at the end of a term shall be filled by the 6appointing authority only for the balance of the term of the 7commissioner whose office is vacant.8    Terms shall run regardless of whether the position is 9filled. 10    (c) The appointing authorities shall appoint commissioners 11who have experience holding governmental office or employment 12and may appoint commissioners who are members of the General 13Assembly as well as commissioners from the general public. A 14commissioner who is a member of the General Assembly must 15recuse himself or herself from participating in any matter 16relating to any investigation or proceeding in which he or she 17is the subject or is a complainant. A person is not eligible to 18serve as a commissioner if that person (i) has been convicted 19of a felony or a crime of dishonesty or moral turpitude, (ii) 20is, or was within the preceding 12 months, engaged in 21activities that require registration under the Lobbyist 22Registration Act, (iii) is a relative of the appointing 23authority, (iv) is a State officer or employee other than a 24member of the General Assembly, or (v) is a candidate for 25statewide, federal, or judicial office.26    (c-5) If a commissioner is required to recuse himself or   SB3370- 23 -LRB104 18795 BDA 32238 b1herself from participating in a matter as provided in 2subsection (c), the recusal shall create a temporary vacancy 3for the limited purpose of consideration of the matter for 4which the commissioner recused himself or herself, and the 5appointing authority for the recusing commissioner shall make 6a temporary appointment to fill the vacancy for consideration 7of the matter for which the commissioner recused himself or 8herself. 9    (d) The Legislative Ethics Commission shall have 10jurisdiction over current and former members of the General 11Assembly regarding events occurring during a member's term of 12office and current and former State employees regarding events 13occurring during any period of employment where the State 14employee's ultimate jurisdictional authority is (i) a 15legislative leader or (ii) the Joint Committee on Legislative 16Support Services. The Legislative Ethics Commission shall have 17jurisdiction over complainants and respondents in violation of 18subsection (d) of Section 25-90, and it shall also have 19jurisdiction over employers who make offers of employment, 20compensation, or fees for services in violation of subsection 21(j) of Section 5-45. The jurisdiction of the Commission is 22limited to matters arising under this Act.23    An officer or executive branch State employee serving on a 24legislative branch board or commission remains subject to the 25jurisdiction of the Executive Ethics Commission and is not 26subject to the jurisdiction of the Legislative Ethics   SB3370- 24 -LRB104 18795 BDA 32238 b1Commission. 2    (e) The Legislative Ethics Commission must meet, either in 3person or by other technological means, monthly or as often as 4necessary. At the first meeting of the Legislative Ethics 5Commission, the commissioners shall choose from their number a 6chairperson and other officers that they deem appropriate. The 7terms of officers shall be for 2 years commencing July 1 and 8running through June 30 of the second following year. Meetings 9shall be held at the call of the chairperson or any 3 10commissioners. Official action by the Commission shall require 11the affirmative vote of 5 commissioners, and a quorum shall 12consist of 5 commissioners. Commissioners shall receive no 13compensation but may be reimbursed for their reasonable 14expenses actually incurred in the performance of their duties.15    (f) No commissioner, other than a commissioner who is a 16member of the General Assembly, or employee of the Legislative 17Ethics Commission may during his or her term of appointment or 18employment:19        (1) become a candidate for any elective office;20        (2) hold any other elected or appointed public office 21    except for appointments on governmental advisory boards or 22    study commissions or as otherwise expressly authorized by 23    law;24        (3) be actively involved in the affairs of any 25    political party or political organization; or26        (4) advocate for the appointment of another person to   SB3370- 25 -LRB104 18795 BDA 32238 b1    an appointed or elected office or position or actively 2    participate in any campaign for any elective office.3    (f-5) No commissioner who is a member of the General 4Assembly may be a candidate for statewide, federal, or 5judicial office. If a commissioner who is a member of the 6General Assembly files petitions to be a candidate for a 7statewide, federal, or judicial office, he or she shall be 8deemed to have resigned from his or her position as a 9commissioner on the date his or her name is certified for the 10ballot by the State Board of Elections or local election 11authority and his or her position as a commissioner shall be 12deemed vacant. Such person may not be reappointed to the 13Commission during any time he or she is a candidate for 14statewide, federal, or judicial office. 15    (g) An appointing authority may remove a commissioner only 16for cause. 17    (h) The Legislative Ethics Commission shall appoint an 18Executive Director subject to the approval of at least 3 of the 194 legislative leaders. The compensation of the Executive 20Director shall be as determined by the Commission. The 21Executive Director of the Legislative Ethics Commission may 22employ, subject to the approval of at least 3 of the 4 23legislative leaders, and determine the compensation of staff, 24as appropriations permit.25    (i) In consultation with the Legislative Inspector 26General, the Legislative Ethics Commission may develop   SB3370- 26 -LRB104 18795 BDA 32238 b1comprehensive training for members and employees under its 2jurisdiction that includes, but is not limited to, sexual 3harassment, employment discrimination, and workplace civility. 4The training may be recommended to the ultimate jurisdictional 5authorities and may be approved by the Commission to satisfy 6the sexual harassment training required under Section 5-10.5 7or be provided in addition to the annual sexual harassment 8training required under Section 5-10.5. The Commission may 9seek input from governmental agencies or private entities for 10guidance in developing such training. 11(Source: P.A. 104-435, eff. 7-1-26.) 12    (5 ILCS 430/50-5)13    Sec. 50-5. Penalties.14    (a) A person is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor if that 15person intentionally violates any provision of Section 5-15, 165-30, 5-40, or 5-45 or Article 15. 17    (a-1) An ethics commission may levy an administrative fine 18for a violation of Section 5-45 of this Act of up to 3 times 19the total annual compensation that was offered or would have 20been obtained in violation of Section 5-45. 21    (b) A person who intentionally violates any provision of 22Section 5-20, 5-35, 5-50, or 5-55 is guilty of a business 23offense subject to a fine of at least $1,001 and up to $5,000. 24    (c) A person who intentionally violates any provision of 25Article 10 is guilty of a business offense and subject to a   SB3370- 27 -LRB104 18795 BDA 32238 b1fine of at least $1,001 and up to $5,000. 2    (d) Any person who intentionally makes a false report 3alleging a violation of any provision of this Act to an ethics 4commission, an inspector general, the Illinois State Police, a 5State's Attorney, the Attorney General, or any other law 6enforcement official is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.7    (e) An ethics commission may levy an administrative fine 8of up to $5,000 against any person who violates this Act, who 9intentionally obstructs or interferes with an investigation 10conducted under this Act by an inspector general, or who 11intentionally makes a false, frivolous, or bad faith 12allegation. 13    (f) In addition to any other penalty that may apply, 14whether criminal or civil, a State employee who intentionally 15violates any provision of Section 5-5, 5-15, 5-20, 5-30, 5-35, 165-45, or 5-50, Article 10, Article 15, or Section 20-90 or 1725-90 is subject to discipline or discharge by the appropriate 18ultimate jurisdictional authority. 19    (g) Any person who violates Section 5-65 is subject to a 20fine of up to $5,000 per offense, and is subject to discipline 21or discharge by the appropriate ultimate jurisdictional 22authority. Each violation of Section 5-65 is a separate 23offense. Any penalty imposed by an ethics commission shall be 24separate and distinct from any fines or penalties imposed by a 25court of law or a State or federal agency. 26    (h) Any natural person or lobbying entity who   SB3370- 28 -LRB104 18795 BDA 32238 b1intentionally violates Section 4.7, paragraph (d) of Section 25, or subsection (a-5) of Section 11 of the Lobbyist 3Registration Act is guilty of a business offense and shall be 4subject to a fine of up to $5,000. The Executive Ethics 5Commission, after the adjudication of a violation of Section 64.7 of the Lobbyist Registration Act for which an 7investigation was initiated by the Inspector General appointed 8by the Secretary of State under Section 14 of the Secretary of 9State Act, is authorized to strike or suspend the registration 10under the Lobbyist Registration Act of any person or lobbying 11entity for which that person is employed for a period of up to 123 years. In addition to any other fine or penalty which may be 13imposed, the Executive Ethics Commission may also levy an 14administrative fine of up to $5,000 for a violation specified 15under this subsection (h). Any penalty imposed by an ethics 16commission shall be separate and distinct from any fines or 17penalties imposed by a court of law or by the Secretary of 18State under the Lobbyist Registration Act. 19(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 20    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 21changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 22that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 23represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 24not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 25made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other   SB3370- 29 -LRB104 18795 BDA 32238 b1Public Act.